Hawaii statutes.
§448-9 Application for licensure. Any
person of eighteen years or more shall be eligible for licensure upon
submission of:

(1) An application to the executive officer of the
board not later than forty-five days prior to the date of the scheduled examination;

(2) Application and examination fees; and

(3) Documentation and credentials that shall include
but are not limited to the following:

(A) A diploma or certificate of graduation
from a dental college accredited by the American Dental Association Commission
on Dental Accreditation, recognized and approved by the board; and

(B) A certificate or other evidence
satisfactory to the board of having passed parts I and II of the National Board
Dental Examination. [L 1949, c 177, pt of §1; am L 1955, c 170, §3(a), (b); RL
1955, §61-9; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 15; am L 1961, c 142, §3(b) and c 184,
§8(b); am L 1963, c 114, §§1, 3; HRS §448-9; am L 1972, c 2, §19 and c 55, §1;
am L 1980, c 251, §2; am L 1982, c 64, §3; am L 1983, c 220, §4; am L 1984, c 7,
§26; am L 1992, c 202, §74; am L 1994, c 124, §4; am L 2004, c 69, §2 and c
166, §§4, 7; am L 2005, c 121, §1; am L 2006, c 31, §2]

Case Notes

Cited: 29 H. 422, 423 (1926).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next